Massachusetts, session 194th, H4569.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Article IV of the charter of the city known as the town of Bridgewater, on
file with the state archivist as provided by section 12 of chapter 43B of the General Laws, is
hereby amended by striking out Section 4-7 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4-7. TEMPORARY ABSENCE
In the event of a temporary absence by the Town Manager of not more than 21
consecutive days, the Assistant Town Manager shall perform the duties of that office.
If the Assistant Town Manager is for any reason unable to serve, the Town Manager shall
appoint a department head of the Town to perform the duties of that office during that period, by
a letter filed with the Town Clerk and the Town Council.
In the event of failure of the Town Manager to make such a designation or if the person
so designated is for any reason unable to serve, or is deemed not qualified by the Town Council,
of 2

the Town Council may appoint some other qualified person to perform the duties of the Town
Manager until the Town Manager returns.
No member of the Town Council shall serve as acting Town Manager.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon approval by a majority of the voters of the
city known as the town of Bridgewater, but not otherwise.
of 2